Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 1 Transportation by Carriers Generally

46-9-130.
Duty of common carrier to receive passengers generally.

A common carrier holding himself out to the public as such is bound to receive all passengers whom he is able and accustomed to carry, upon compliance with such reasonable regulations as he may adopt for his own safety and for the benefit of the public.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2042; Code 1868, § 2043; Code 1873, § 2069; Code 1882, § 2069; Civil Code 1895, § 2278; Civil Code 1910, § 2729; Code 1933, § 18-202.

Cross references.

Equal protection, U.S. Const., Amend. 14 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. II.

46-9-131.
Extent of right of carriers to refuse admittance to persons and to eject passengers.

Carriers of passengers may refuse to admit to, or may eject from, their conveyances all persons who refuse to comply with reasonable regulations of the carrier or who exhibit improper conduct. Carriers may also refuse to convey persons seeking to interfere with their business or interests.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2053; Code 1868, § 2056; Code 1873, § 2082; Code 1882, § 2082; Civil Code 1895, § 2296; Civil Code 1910, § 2750; Code 1933, § 18-203.

Cross references.

Penalty for littering, playing radio on, obstructing operation of, etc., public transit bus, rapid rail car, etc., §

16-12-120

.

Penalty for bus or rail hijacking, boarding with concealed weapon, etc., §

16-12-123

.

46-9-132.
Duty of carriers of passengers to exercise extraordinary diligence.

A carrier of passengers must exercise extraordinary diligence to protect the lives and persons of his passengers but is not liable for injuries to them after having used such diligence.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2040; Code 1868, § 2041; Code 1873, § 2067; Code 1882, § 2067; Civil Code 1895, § 2266; Civil Code 1910, § 2714; Code 1933, § 18-204.

Cross references.

Duty of drivers of motor vehicles carrying passengers for hire to stop at railroad crossings, §

40-6-142

.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Uber Million Dollar Question: Are Uber Drivers Employees or Independent Contractors?,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 461 (2017).

For note, “Tort Liability in Georgia for the Criminal Acts of Another,” see 18 Ga. L. Rev. 361 (1984).

46-9-133.
Duty of common carriers of passengers to furnish comfortable seats and to light and ventilate cars.

Common carriers doing business in this state shall furnish to their passengers comfortable seats and shall have the railroad car or other vehicle well and sufficiently lighted and ventilated.

Any common carrier which violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 132, § 1; Code 1868, § 4498; Code 1873, § 4585; Code 1882, § 4585; Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 157, §§ 1, 4, 5, 7; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2269, 2272, 2273, 2275; Penal Code 1895, §§ 522, 526; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2717, 2720, 2721, 2723; Penal Code 1910, §§ 529, 534; Code 1933, §§ 18-206, 18-9903; Ga. L. 1979, p. 945, § 1.

46-9-134.
Duty of conductors or other railroad employees to assign passengers to cars and compartments; investing of conductors and railroad employees with police powers.

All conductors or other railroad employees in charge of passenger cars shall assign all passengers to their respective cars, or compartments of cars, provided by the railroad company. All conductors of street cars and buses shall assign all passengers to seats on the cars under their charge. All conductors and other employees of railroads and all conductors of street cars and buses shall have, and are invested with, police powers to carry out this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 157, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2270; Civil Code 1910, § 2718; Code 1933, § 18-207; Ga. L. 1979, p. 945, § 2.

46-9-135.
Duty of passengers to remain in assigned car, compartment, or seat; ejectment of passenger by conductor and railroad employees.

No passenger shall remain in any car, compartment, or seat other than the one to which he has been assigned. The conductor and any and all employees on such cars shall have the power to eject from the train or car any passenger who refuses to remain in the car, compartment, or seat assigned to him.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 157, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2271; Civil Code 1910, § 2719; Code 1933, §§ 18-208, 18-9904.

46-9-136.
Carriage of baggage.

A carrier of passengers may limit the value of the baggage which may be taken on board in proportion to the fare paid.

A carrier of passengers shall be responsible for the value of lost baggage, regardless of whether an extra charge was demanded or paid for carriage of the baggage, provided that a carrier of passengers shall be responsible only for baggage placed in his custody; provided, further, that the liability of the carrier shall extend only to such articles as a traveler for business or pleasure would carry for his own use.

A passenger shall not have the right to receive a reduction in fare by assuming custody of his own baggage.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2044, 2051; Code 1868, §§ 2045, 2048; Code 1873, §§ 2071, 2081; Code 1882, §§ 2071, 2081; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2280, 2288; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2731, 2742; Code 1933, §§ 18-220, 18-222.

Cross references.

Penalty for unauthorized removal of baggage, freight, or other item transported by bus or stored in terminal, §

16-12-124

.

46-9-137.
Granting of passes by common carriers to former employees and their immediate family.

Common carriers may grant passes upon their transportation lines to any former employee of the company and his immediate family if such employee, owing to length of service or because of an injury suffered in the service of the company, has been retired from the company but is kept on the payroll under a system of pensioning or a similar system. Such passes shall be good only for intrastate passage.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 163, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2735; Code 1933, § 18-217.

46-9-138.
Granting of annual passes by common carriers to sheriffs and their deputies.

Common carriers operating in this state may issue annual passes to all sheriffs and their lawful deputies, provided that the term “sheriffs and their lawful deputies,” as used in this Code section, means one sheriff and one lawful deputy for each county; provided, further, that whenever any sheriff or deputy travels on such free pass, such sheriff or deputy shall have no right to charge or collect, from any source, railroad fare covering such trip.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 173, § 1; Code 1933, § 18-218.

46-9-139.
Selling or dealing in passenger tickets by person other than authorized agent of common carrier issuing such tickets.

It shall be unlawful for any person, other than the authorized agent of the common carrier issuing the same, to sell or otherwise deal in, or offer to sell, any passenger ticket which was issued and sold for less than the standard schedule rate under contract with the original purchaser and upon which ticket appears a statement, signed by the original purchaser, that the ticket is nontransferable and void in the hands of any person other than the original purchaser, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed as interfering with the right of the original purchaser of a transferable ticket to sell the same to a person who will in good faith personally use it to embark on a journey.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1904, p. 102, §§ 1, 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2733; Penal Code 1910, § 636; Code 1933, §§ 18-215, 18-9911.

46-9-140.
Duty of common carriers to redeem unused tickets and unused portions of tickets.

It shall be the duty of every common carrier who has sold any tickets or other evidence of the purchaser’s right to travel on its line or on any line of which it forms a part, if the whole of such ticket is unused, to redeem the same, paying the original purchaser thereof the actual amount for which the ticket was sold, or if any part of such ticket is unused, to redeem such unused part, paying the original purchaser thereof at a rate which shall be equal to the difference between the price paid for the whole ticket and the price of a ticket between the points for which the ticket was actually used, provided that such purchaser shall present such unused or partly used ticket for redemption, within six months after the date of its issuance, to the officer or agent who is authorized or designated by such common carrier to redeem unused or partly used tickets; and the officer shall, within 15 days after the receipt of such ticket, redeem the same as provided for in this Code section. Such redemption shall be made without cost of exchange or other expense to the purchaser of the ticket.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1904, p. 102, §§ 2, 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2734; Penal Code 1910, § 636; Code 1933, §§ 18-216, 18-9911.